Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB36.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 314A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
RESPIRATORY CARE INTERSTATE COMPACT
SECTION 1.
TITLE AND PURPOSE
A. The purpose of this compact is to facilitate the interstate practice of respiratory therapy with the goal of
improving public access to respiratory therapy services by providing respiratory therapists licensed in a
member state the ability to practice in other member states. This compact preserves the regulatory authority
of states to protect public health and safety through the current system of state licensure.
B. This compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
1. Increase public access to respiratory therapy services by creating a responsible, streamlined pathway
for licensees to practice in member states with the goal of improving outcomes for patients;
2. Enhance states’ ability to protect the public’s health and safety;
3. Promote the cooperation of member states in regulating the practice of respiratory therapy within
those member states;
4. Ease administrative burdens on states by encouraging the cooperation of member states in regulating
multistate respiratory therapy practice;
5. Support relocating active military members and their spouses; and
6. Promote mobility and address workforce shortages.
SECTION 2.
DEFINITIONS
As used in this compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions shall apply:
A. "Active military member" means any person with a full-time duty status in the Armed Forces of the United
States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve;
B. "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action permitted by a state’s laws
which is imposed by any state authority with regulatory authority over respiratory therapists, such as license
denial, censure, revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, or restriction on the
licensee’s practice, not including participation in an alternative program;
C. "Alternative program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring or practice remediation process applicable to a
respiratory therapist approved by any state authority with regulatory authority over respiratory therapists.
This includes but is not limited to programs to which licensees with substance abuse or addiction issues are
referred in lieu of adverse action;
D. "Charter member states" means those member states who were the first seven (7) states to enact the
compact into the laws of their state;
E. "Commission" or "Respiratory Care Interstate Compact Commission" means the government
instrumentality and body politic whose membership consists of all member states that have enacted the
compact;
F. "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a member state to serve as the member of the
commission for that member state;
G. "Compact" means the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
H. "Compact privilege" means the authorization granted by a remote state to allow a licensee from another
member state to practice as a respiratory therapist in the remote state under the remote state’s laws and
rules. The practice of respiratory therapy occurs in the member state where the patient is located at the time
of the patient encounter;
I. "Criminal background check" means the submission by the member state of fingerprints or other
biometric-based information on license applicants at the time of initial licensing for the purpose of
obtaining that applicant’s criminal history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. sec. 20.3(d) or
successor provision, from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the state’s criminal history record
repository, as defined in 28 C.F.R. sec. 20.3(f) or successor provision;
J. "Data system" means the commission’s repository of information about licensees as further set forth in
Section 8 of this compact;
K. "Domicile" means the jurisdiction which is the licensee’s principal home for legal purposes;
L. "Encumbered license" means a license that a state’s respiratory therapy licensing authority has limited in
any way;
M. "Executive committee" means a group of directors elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the
powers granted to them by, the commission;
N. "Home state" except as set forth in Section 5 of this compact, means the member state that is the licensee’s
primary domicile;
O. "Home state license" means an active license to practice respiratory therapy in a home state that is not an
encumbered license;
P. "Jurisprudence requirement" means an assessment of an individual’s knowledge of the state laws and
regulations governing the practice of respiratory therapy in such state;
Q. "Licensee" means an individual who currently holds an authorization from the state to practice as a
respiratory therapist;
R. "Member state" means a state that has enacted the compact and been admitted to the commission in
accordance with the provisions herein and commission rules;
S. "Model compact" means the model for the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact on file with the Council of
State Governments or other entity as designated by the commission;
T. "Remote state" means a member state where a licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise the compact
privilege;
U. "Respiratory therapist" or "respiratory care practitioner" means an individual who holds a credential
issued by the National Board for Respiratory Care, or its successor, and holds a license in a state to practice
respiratory therapy. For purposes of this compact, any other title or status adopted by a state to replace the
term "respiratory therapist" or "respiratory care practitioner" shall be deemed synonymous with
"respiratory therapist" and shall confer the same rights and responsibilities to the licensee under the
provisions of this compact at the time of its enactment;
V. "Respiratory therapy," "respiratory therapy practice," "respiratory care," "the practice of respiratory
care," and "the practice of respiratory therapy" means the care and services provided by or under the
direction and supervision of a respiratory therapist or respiratory care practitioner;
W. "Respiratory therapy licensing authority" means the agency, board, or other body of a state that is
responsible for licensing and regulation of respiratory therapists;
X. "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by the commission that has the force and effect of law;
Y. "Scope of practice" means the procedures, actions, and processes a respiratory therapist licensed in a state
or practicing under a compact privilege in a state is permitted to undertake in that state and the
circumstances under which the respiratory therapist is permitted to undertake those procedures, actions,
and processes. Such procedures, actions, and processes, and the circumstances under which they may be
undertaken, may be established through means, including but not limited to statutes, regulations, case law,
and other processes available to the state respiratory therapy licensing authority or other government
agency;

CHAPTER 33 3
Z. "Significant investigative information" means information, records, and documents received or generated
by a state respiratory therapy licensing authority pursuant to an investigation for which a determination has
been made that there is probable cause to believe that the licensee has violated a statute or regulation that is
considered more than a minor infraction for which the state respiratory therapy licensing authority could
pursue adverse action against the licensee; and
AA. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States.
SECTION 3.
STATE PARTICIPATION IN THIS COMPACT
A. In order to participate in this compact and thereafter continue as a member state, a member state shall:
1. Enact a compact that is not materially different from the model compact;
2. License respiratory therapists;
3. Participate in the commission’s data system;
4. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints against licensees and compact
privilege holders;
5. Notify the commission, in compliance with the terms of this compact and commission rules, of any
adverse action against a licensee, a compact privilege holder, or a license applicant;
6. Notify the commission, in compliance with the terms of this compact and commission rules, of the
existence of significant investigative information;
7. Comply with the rules of the commission;
8. Grant the compact privilege to a holder of an active home state license and otherwise meet the
applicable requirements of Section 4 of this compact in a member state; and
9. a. Complete a criminal background check for each new licensee at the time of initial licensure.
b. Where expressly authorized or permitted by federal law, whether such federal law is in effect
prior to, at, or after the time of a member state’s enactment of this compact, a member state’s
enactment of this compact shall hereby authorize the member state’s respiratory therapy
licensing authority to perform criminal background checks as defined in Section 2 of this
compact. The absence of such a federal law as described in this subsection shall not prevent or
preclude such authorization where it may be derived or granted through means other than the
enactment of this compact.
B. Nothing in this compact prohibits a member state from charging a fee for granting and renewing the
compact privilege.
SECTION 4.
COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To exercise the compact privilege under the terms and provisions of the compact, the licensee shall:
1. Hold and maintain an active home state license as a respiratory therapist;
2. Hold and maintain an active credential from the National Board for Respiratory Care, or its
successor, that would qualify them for licensure in the remote state in which they are seeking the
compact privilege;
3. Have not had any adverse action against a license within the previous two (2) years;
4. Notify the commission that the licensee is seeking the compact privilege within a remote state;
5. Pay any applicable fees, including any state and commission fees and renewal fees, for the compact
privilege;
6. Meet any jurisprudence requirements established by the remote state in which the licensee is seeking
a compact privilege;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
7. Report to the commission adverse action taken by any nonmember state within thirty (30) days from
the date the adverse action is taken;
8. Report to the commission, when applying for a compact privilege, the address of the licensee’s
domicile and thereafter promptly report to the commission any change in the address of the
licensee’s domicile within thirty (30) days of the effective date of the change in address; and
9. Consent to accept service of process by mail at the licensee’s domicile on record with the commission
with respect to any action brought against the licensee by the commission or a member state, and
consent to accept service of a subpoena by mail at the licensee’s domicile on record with the
commission with respect any action brought or investigation conducted by the commission or a
member state.
B. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date or revocation of the home state license unless
terminated pursuant to adverse action. The licensee must comply with all of the requirements of subsection
A. of this section to maintain the compact privilege in a remote state. If those requirements are met, no
adverse actions are taken, and the licensee has paid any applicable compact privilege renewal fees, then the
licensee will maintain the licensee’s compact privilege.
C. A licensee providing respiratory therapy in a remote state under the compact privilege shall function within
the scope of practice authorized by the remote state for the type of respiratory therapist license the licensee
holds. Such procedures, actions, processes, and the circumstances under which they may be undertaken
may be established through means, including but not limited to statutes, regulations, case law, and other
processes available to the state respiratory therapy licensing authority or other government agency.
D. If a licensee’s compact privilege in a remote state is removed by the remote state, the individual shall lose or
be ineligible for the compact privilege in that remote state until the compact privilege is no longer limited or
restricted by that state.
E. If a home state license is encumbered, the licensee shall lose the compact privilege in all remote states until
the following occur:
1. The home state license is no longer encumbered; and
2. Two (2) years have elapsed from the date on which the license is no longer encumbered due to the
adverse action.
F. Once a licensee with a restricted or limited license meets the requirements of subsection E. of this section,
the licensee must also meet the requirements of subsection A. of this section to obtain a compact privilege in
a remote state.
SECTION 5.
ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER OR THEIR SPOUSE
A. An active military member, or their spouse, shall designate a home state where the individual has a current
license in good standing. The individual may retain the home state designation during the period the service
member is on active duty.
B. An active military member and their spouse shall not be required to pay to the commission for a compact
privilege any fee that may otherwise be charged by the commission. If a remote state chooses to charge a fee
for a compact privilege, it may choose to charge a reduced fee or no fee to an active military member and
their spouse for a compact privilege.
SECTION 6.
ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. A member state in which a licensee is licensed shall have authority to impose adverse action against the
license issued by that member state.
B. A member state may take adverse action based on significant investigative information of a remote state or
the home state, so long as the member state follows its own procedures for imposing adverse action.
C. Nothing in this compact shall override a member state’s decision that participation in an alternative
program may be used in lieu of adverse action and that such participation shall remain nonpublic if
required by the member state’s laws.

CHAPTER 33 5
D. A remote state shall have the authority to:
1. Take adverse actions as set forth herein against a licensee’s compact privilege in that state;
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of
witnesses, and the production of evidence.
a. Subpoenas may be issued by a respiratory therapy licensing authority in a member state for
the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence.
b. Subpoenas issued by a respiratory therapy licensing authority in a member state for the
attendance and testimony of witnesses shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of
competent jurisdiction in the latter state, according to the practice and procedure of that court
applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it.
c. Subpoenas issued by a respiratory therapy licensing authority in a member state for
production of evidence from another member state shall be enforced in the latter state,
according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in the
proceedings pending before it.
d. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees
required by the service statutes of the state where the witnesses or evidence are located;
3. Unless otherwise prohibited by state law, recover from the licensee the costs of investigations and
disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that licensee;
4. Notwithstanding paragraph 2. of this subsection, a member state may not issue a subpoena to gather
evidence of conduct in another member state that is lawful in such other member state for the
purpose of taking adverse action against a licensee’s compact privilege or application for a compact
privilege in that member state; and
5. Nothing in this compact authorizes a member state to impose discipline against a respiratory
therapist’s compact privilege in that member state for the individual’s otherwise lawful practice in
another state.
E. Joint investigations.
1. In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its respective respiratory therapy practice
act or other applicable state law, a member state may participate with other member states in joint
investigations of licensees, provided, however, that a member state receiving such a request has no
obligation to respond to any subpoena issued regarding an investigation of conduct or practice that
was lawful in a member state at the time it was undertaken.
2. Member states shall share any significant investigative information, litigation, or compliance
materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the compact. In
sharing such information between member state respiratory therapy licensing authorities, all
information obtained shall be kept confidential, except as otherwise mutually agreed upon by the
sharing and receiving member state or states.
F. Nothing in this compact may permit a member state to take any adverse action against a licensee or holder
of a compact privilege for conduct or practice that was legal in the member state at the time it was
undertaken.
G. Nothing in this compact may permit a member state to take disciplinary action against a licensee or holder
of a compact privilege for conduct or practice that was legal in the member state at the time it was
undertaken.
SECTION 7.
ESTABLISHMENT OF THE RESPIRATORY CARE INTERSTATE COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The compact member states hereby create and establish a joint government agency whose membership
consists of all member states that have enacted the compact known as the Respiratory Care Interstate
Compact Commission. The commission is an instrumentality of the compact member states acting jointly
and not an instrumentality of any one (1) state. The commission shall come into existence on or after the
effective date of the compact, as set forth in Section 11 of this compact.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings.
1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1) commissioner selected by that member state’s
respiratory therapy licensing authority.
2. The commissioner shall be an administrator or their designated staff member of the member state’s
respiratory therapy licensing authority.
3. The commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office for commissioners and may by rule
or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The commission may recommend to a member state the removal or suspension any commissioner
from office.
5. A member state’s respiratory therapy licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its commissioner
occurring on the commission within sixty (60) days of the vacancy.
6. Each commissioner shall be entitled to one (1) vote on all matters before the commission requiring a
vote by commissioners.
7. A commissioner shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws
may provide for commissioners to meet by telecommunication, videoconference, or other means of
communication.
8. The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings may be held
as set forth in the bylaws.
C. The commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish and amend the fiscal year of the commission;
2. Establish and amend bylaws and policies, including but not limited to a code of conduct and conflict
of interest;
3. Establish and amend rules, which shall be binding in all member states;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact, the commission’s
rules, and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and conduct legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission, provided that the
standing of any respiratory therapy licensing authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall
not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state as the authenticated
business records of the commission, and designate an agent to do so on the commission’s behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Accept or contract for services of personnel, including but not limited to employees of a member
state;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals
appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the compact, and establish the commission’s
personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and
other related personnel matters;
12. Assess and collect fees;
13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other sources of revenue,
equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same, provided
that at all times:
a. The commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety; and
b. The commission shall avoid any appearance of conflict of interest;

CHAPTER 33 7
14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real, personal, or mixed, or any
undivided interest therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real,
personal, or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money in a fiscally responsible manner;
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of commissioners, state regulators,
state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other interested
persons as may be designated in this compact and the bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;
20. Establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair, vice-chair, secretary, treasurer, and
such other offices as the commission shall establish by rule or bylaw;
21. Enter into contracts or arrangements for the management of the affairs of the commission;
22. Determine whether a state’s adopted language is materially different from the model compact
language such that the state would not qualify for participation in the compact; and
23. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this
compact.
D. The Executive Committee.
1. The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the commission according to the
terms of this compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the executive committee shall
include:
a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the compact, including
enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the compact, its rules and bylaws, and
other such duties as deemed necessary;
b. Recommending to the commission changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to this compact
legislation, fees charged to compact member states, fees charged to licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensuring compact administration services are appropriately provided, including by contract;
d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the commission;
f. Monitoring compact compliance of member states and providing compliance reports to the
commission;
g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercising the powers and duties of the commission during the interim between commission
meetings, except for adopting or amending rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and
exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the commission by rule or bylaw;
and
i. Performing other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the commission.
2. The executive committee shall be composed of up to nine (9) members, as further set forth in the
bylaws of the commission:
a. Seven (7) voting members who are elected by the commission from the current membership of
the commission; and
b. Two (2) ex-officio, nonvoting members;
3. The commission may remove any member of the executive committee as provided in the
commission’s bylaws.
4. The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
a. Executive committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the executive committee
may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in subsection F.4. of this section;
b. The executive committee shall give advance notice of its meetings, posted on its website and as
determined to provide notice to persons with an interest in the business of the commission;
and
c. The executive committee may hold a special meeting in accordance with subsection F.2. of this
section.
E. The commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an annual report.
F. Meetings of the Compact Commission.
1. All meetings of the commission that are not closed pursuant to paragraph 4. of this subsection shall
be open to the public. Notice of public meetings shall be posted on the commission’s website at least
thirty (30) days prior to the public meeting.
2. Notwithstanding paragraph 1. of this subsection, the commission may convene an emergency public
meeting by providing at least twenty-four (24) hours prior notice on the commission’s website, and
any other means as provided in the commission’s rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with
notice of proposed rulemaking under subsection G. of Section 9 of this compact. The commission’s
legal counsel shall certify that one (1) of the reasons justifying an emergency public meeting has
been met.
3. Notice of all commission meetings shall provide the time, date, and location of the meeting, and if the
meeting is to be held or accessible via telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic
means, the notice shall include the mechanism for access to the meeting.
4. The commission or the executive committee may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting for the
commission or executive committee to receive or solicit legal advice or to discuss:
a. Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or procedures related to
specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a licensee or compact privilege holder by the commission
or by a member state’s respiratory therapy licensing authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted
invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the
commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or determination
of compliance issues pursuant to the compact;
k. Legal advice;
l. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state law; or
m. Other matters as promulgated by the commission by rule.
5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state that the meeting will
be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in
the minutes.
6. The commission shall keep minutes in accordance with commission rules and bylaws. All documents
considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and

CHAPTER 33 9
documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of
the commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Compact Commission.
1. The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its
establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
2. The commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as provided herein.
3. The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state and impose
fees on licensees of member states to whom it grants a compact privilege to cover the cost of the
operations and activities of the commission and its staff. The aggregate annual assessment amount
for member states, if any, shall be allocated based upon a formula that the commission shall
promulgate by rule.
4. The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds or a loan
adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the member states,
except by and with the authority of the member state.
5. The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and
disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the financial review and accounting procedures
established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the
commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed public
accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included in and become part of the annual
report of the commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification.
1. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any licensee for professional
malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
2. The member states, commissioners, officers, executive directors, employees, and agents of the
commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for
any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against
whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability
caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement of
insurance of any type by the commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity
granted hereunder.
3. The commission shall defend any commissioner, officer, executive director, employee, and agent of
the commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error, or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or as determined by the commission that the person against whom the claim is made
had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from
retaining their own counsel at their own expense, and provided further, that the actual or alleged act,
error, or omission did not result from that person’s intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
4. The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any commissioner, member, officer, executive
director, employee, and agent of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment
obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred
within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
5. Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a member state’s state
action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the
Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or
regulation.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
6. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity by the member
states or by the commission.
7. The liability of the executive director and employees of the compact commission or representatives of
the compact commission, acting within the scope of such person's employment or duties for acts,
errors, or omissions, may not exceed the limits of liability set forth under the constitution and laws of
this state for state officials, employees, and agents. The compact commission is considered to be an
instrumentality of the states for the purposes of any such action.
SECTION 8.
DATA SYSTEM
A. The commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated
database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse action, and the presence of significant
investigative information.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform
data set to the data system as required by the rules of the commission, including but not limited to:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a licensee, license applicant, or compact privilege holder and information
related thereto;
4. Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation, the beginning and ending
dates of such participation, and other information related to such participation not made confidential
under member state law;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for such denial;
6. The presence of current significant investigative information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact or the protection of the
public, as determined by the rules of the commission.
C. No member state shall submit any information which constitutes criminal history record information, as
defined by applicable federal law, to the data system established hereunder.
D. The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to this compact or through the data
system, when certified by the commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business
records of the commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant
judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a member state.
E. Significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any member state will only be available to
other member states.
F. It is the responsibility of the member states to report any adverse action against a licensee and to monitor
the database to determine whether adverse action has been taken against a licensee. adverse action
information pertaining to a licensee in any member state will be available to any other member state.
G. Member states contributing information to the data system may designate information that may not be
shared with the public without the express permission of the contributing state.
H. Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the
laws of the member state contributing the information shall be removed from the data system.
SECTION 9.
RULEMAKING
A. The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and efficiently implement and
administer the purposes and provisions of the compact. A rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect
only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because the commission exercised its
rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the compact, or the powers
granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
B. For purposes of the compact, the rules of the commission shall have the force of law in each member state.

CHAPTER 33 11
C. The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section and
the rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or portion of a rule, by enactment of a
statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact within four (4) years of the date of
adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to
provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the commission, and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the
meeting at which the commission will hold a public hearing on the proposed rule, the commission shall
provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the commission or other publicly accessible platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the commission’s notices of proposed rulemaking, and
3. In such other ways as the commission may by rule specify.
H. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the commission will hear public
comments on the proposed rule and, if different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the
commission will consider and vote on the proposed rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic means, the
mechanism for access to the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments and documents received by
the commission in response to the proposed rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be
grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings required by this section.
K. The commission shall, by majority vote of all commissioners, take final action on the proposed rule based
on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
1. The commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided the changes are consistent with
the original purpose of the proposed rule.
2. The commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive changes made to the
proposed rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not made that were recommended by
commenters.
3. The commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the rule. Except for an emergency as
provided in subsection L. of this section, the effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than thirty
(30) days after issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule
with twenty-four (24) hours’ notice, and with opportunity to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking
procedures provided in the compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the
purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
M. The commission or an authorized committee of the commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted
rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical
errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission. The revision shall be
subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be
challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be
made in writing and delivered to the commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is
made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not
take effect without the approval of the commission.
N. No member state’s rulemaking process or procedural requirements shall apply to the commission. The
commission shall have no authority over any member state’s rulemaking process or procedural
requirements that do not pertain to the compact.
O. Nothing in this compact, nor any rule or regulation of the commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict,
or in any way reduce the ability of a member state to enact and enforce laws, regulations, or other rules
related to the practice of respiratory therapy in that state, where those laws, regulations, or other rules are
not inconsistent with the provisions of this compact.
SECTION 10.
OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight.
1. The executive and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce this
compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement the compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall be brought solely and
exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is
located. The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or
consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or
limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against a licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding regarding the
enforcement or interpretation of the compact and shall have standing to intervene in such a
proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the commission service of process shall render a
judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or promulgated rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination.
1. If the commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations
or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall provide written
notice to the defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed means of
curing the default, and any other action that the commission may take, and shall offer training and
specific technical assistance regarding the default.
2. The commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other member states.
C. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon
an affirmative vote of a majority of the commissioners of the member states, and all rights, privileges, and
benefits conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A
cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period
of default.
D. Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing
compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the commission
to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, the defaulting state’s
respiratory therapy licensing authority and each of the member states’ respiratory therapy licensing
authorities.
E. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred
through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of
termination, if necessary.

CHAPTER 33 13
F. Upon the termination of a state’s membership from this compact, that state shall immediately provide notice
to all licensees and compact privilege holders, of which the commission has a record, within that state of
such termination. The terminated state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this
compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of said notice of termination.
G. The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or that has been
terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting
state.
H. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United States District Court
for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices. The
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute Resolution.
1. Upon request by a member state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the
compact that arise among member states and between member and nonmember states.
2. The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution
for disputes, as appropriate.
J. Enforcement.
1. By majority vote, as may be further provided by rule, the commission may initiate legal action against
a member state in default in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the
provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules. A member state by enactment of this compact
consents to venue and jurisdiction in such court for the purposes set forth herein. The relief sought
may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may
pursue any other remedies available under federal or the defaulting member state’s law.
2. A member state may initiate legal action against the commission in the United States District Court
for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices to
enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought
may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. No person other than a member state shall enforce this compact against the commission.
SECTION 11.
EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the
seventh member state.
1. On or after the effective date of the compact, the commission shall convene and review the enactment
of each of the first seven (7) member states to determine if the statute enacted by each such charter
member state is materially different than the model compact.
a. A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially different from the model
compact shall be entitled to the default process set forth in Section 10 of this compact.
b. If any member state is later found to be in default, or is terminated or withdraws from the
compact, the commission shall remain in existence and the compact shall remain in effect
even if the number of member states should be less than seven (7).
2. Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the seven (7) initial charter member states shall
be subject to the process set forth herein and commission rule to determine if their enactments are
materially different from the model compact and whether they qualify for participation in the
compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the commission or in furtherance of the purposes of the
administration of the compact prior to the effective date of the compact or the commission coming
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
into existence shall be considered to be actions of the commission unless specifically repudiated by
the commission. The commission shall own and have all rights to any intellectual property developed
on behalf or in furtherance of the commission by individuals or entities involved in organizing or
establishing the commission, as may be further set forth in rules of the commission.
4. Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the commission’s initial adoption of the rules and
bylaws shall be subject to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact
becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the commission shall have
the full force and effect of law on the date the compact becomes law in that state.
B. Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred eighty (180) days after
enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state’s respiratory
therapy licensing authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting
requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a state shall immediately provide
notice of such withdrawal to all licensees and compact privilege holders, of which the commission
has a record, within that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary,
such withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a
minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or
other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a nonmember state that does not conflict with
the provisions of this compact.
D. This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective
and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.
SECTION 12.
CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This compact and the commission’s rulemaking authority shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the
purposes and the implementation and administration of the compact. Provisions of the compact expressly
authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be construed to limit the commission’s
rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this
compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any member state,
a state seeking participation in the compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to any
government, agency, person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any other
government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B. of this section, the commission may deny a state’s participation in the
compact or, in accordance with the requirements of Section 10 of this compact, terminate a member state’s
participation in the compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a member state is a
material departure from the compact. Otherwise, if this compact shall be held to be contrary to the
constitution of any member state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining
member states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all severable matters.
SECTION 13.
CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not
inconsistent with the compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in conflict with the compact
are superseded to the extent of the conflict, including any subsequently enacted state laws.
C. All permissible agreements between the commission and the member states are binding in accordance with
their terms.

CHAPTER 33 15
D. Other than as expressly set forth herein, nothing in this compact will impact initial licensure.
SECTION 14.
APPLICABILITY TO KENTUCKY STATE GOVERNMENT
In order to clarify the effect of certain provisions of this compact and to ensure that the rights and responsibilities
of the various branches of government are maintained, the following shall be in effect in this state:
A. By entering into this compact, this state authorizes the state respiratory therapy licensing authority as
defined in Section 2.W. of this compact and as created by KRS 314A.200 to implement the provisions of this
compact;
B. Notwithstanding any provision of this compact to the contrary:
1. When a rule is adopted pursuant to Section 9 of this compact, the state respiratory therapy licensing
authority as defined in Section 2.W. of this compact shall have sixty (60) days to review the rule for
the purpose of filing the rule as an emergency administrative regulation pursuant to KRS 13A.190
and for filing the rule as an accompanying ordinary administrative regulation, in accordance with
the requirements in KRS Chapter 13A. Failure by the state respiratory therapy licensing authority as
defined in Section 2.W. of this compact to promulgate a rule adopted by the Respiratory Care
Interstate Compact Commission as an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A shall
result in the initiation of the process for withdrawal as set forth in Section 11 of this compact.
Nothing in these provisions shall negate the applicability and effect of a commission rule or Section
9 of this compact to this state;
2. If the proposed administrative regulation is found deficient and the deficiency is not resolved
pursuant to KRS 13A.330 or 13A.335, the provisions of Section 10 of this compact shall apply. If the
deficiency is resolved in a manner determined by the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact
Commission to be inconsistent with this compact or its rules, or if the procedures under Section 10 of
this compact fail to resolve an issue, the withdrawal provisions of Section 11 of this compact shall
apply; and
3. If a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact
Commission created by Section 7 of this compact exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that
is beyond the scope of the purposes of this compact, or the powers granted under this compact, then
such an action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force or effect;
C. Section 7.G. of this compact pertaining to the financing of the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact
Commission shall not be interpreted to obligate the general fund of this state. Any funds used to finance
this compact shall be from money collected pursuant to KRS 314A.215; and
D. This compact shall apply only to those respiratory therapists who practice or work under a compact
privilege.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 310 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
SECTION 1.
PURPOSE
The purpose of this compact is to facilitate interstate practice of dietetics with the goal of improving public access
to dietetics services. This compact preserves the regulatory authority of states to protect public health and safety
through the current system of state licensure, while also providing for licensure portability through a compact
privilege granted to qualifying professionals. This compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
A. Increase public access to dietetics services;
B. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by licensed dietitians who meet uniform requirements;
C. Eliminate the necessity for licenses in multiple states;
D. Reduce administrative burden on member states and licensees;
E. Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health and safety;
F. Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating multistate practice of licensed dietitians;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
G. Support relocating active military members and their spouses;
H. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary information among member states; and
I. Vest all member states with the authority to hold a licensed dietitian accountable for meeting all state
practice laws in the state in which the patient is located at the time care is rendered.
SECTION 2.
DEFINITIONS
As used in this compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following definitions shall apply:
A. "ACEND" means the Accreditation Council for Education in Nutrition and Dietetics or its successor
organization;
B. "Active military member" means any individual with full-time duty status in the active Armed Forces of the
United States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve;
C. "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action permitted by a state’s laws
which is imposed by a licensing authority or other authority against a licensee, including actions against an
individual’s license or compact privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the
licensee, limitation on the licensee’s practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a licensee’s
authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action;
D. "Alternative program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring or practice remediation process approved by a
licensing authority;
E. "CDR" means the Commission on Dietetic Registration or its successor organization;
F. "Charter member state" means any member state which enacted this compact by law before the effective
date specified in Section 12 of this compact;
G. "Compact commission" means the government agency whose membership consists of all states that have
enacted this compact, which is known as the Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission, as described in
Section 8 of this compact, and which shall operate as an instrumentality of the member states;
H. "Compact privilege" means a legal authorization, which is equivalent to a license, permitting the practice
of dietetics in a remote state;
I. "Continuing education" means a requirement, as a condition of license renewal, to provide evidence of
participation in, and completion of, educational and professional activities relevant to practice or area of
work;
J. "Current significant investigative information" means:
1. Investigative information that a licensing authority, after a preliminary inquiry that includes
notification and an opportunity for the subject licensee to respond, if required by state law, has
reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction;
or
2. Investigative information that indicates that the subject licensee represents an immediate threat to
public health and safety regardless of whether the subject licensee has been notified and had an
opportunity to respond;
K. "Data system" means a repository of information about licensees, including but not limited to continuing
education, examination, licensure, investigative, compact privilege, and adverse action information;
L. "Encumbered license" means a license in which an adverse action restricts a licensee’s ability to practice
dietetics;
M. "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on, a licensee’s full and
unrestricted practice of dietetics by a licensing authority;
N. "Executive committee" means a group of delegates elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the
powers granted to them by, this compact and the compact commission;
O. "Home state" means the member state that is the licensee’s primary state of residence or that has been
designated pursuant to Section 6 of this compact;

CHAPTER 33 17
P. "Investigative information" means information, records, and documents received or generated by a
licensing authority pursuant to an investigation;
Q. "Jurisprudence requirement" means an assessment of an individual’s knowledge of the state laws and
regulations governing the practice of dietetics in such state;
R. "License" means an authorization from a member state to either:
1. Engage in the practice of dietetics, including medical nutrition therapy; or
2. Use the title "dietitian," "licensed dietitian," "licensed dietitian nutritionist," "certified dietitian," or
other title describing a substantially similar practitioner as the compact commission may further
define by rule;
S. "Licensee" or "licensed dietitian" means an individual who currently holds a license and who meets all of
the requirements outlined in Section 4 of this compact;
T. "Licensing authority" means the board or agency of a state, or equivalent, that is responsible for the
licensing and regulation of the practice of dietetics;
U. "Member state" means a state that has enacted the compact;
V. "Practice of dietetics" means the synthesis and application of dietetics as defined by state law and
administrative regulations, primarily for the provision of nutrition care services, including medical
nutrition therapy, in person or via telehealth, to prevent, manage, or treat diseases or medical conditions
and promote wellness;
W. "Registered dietitian" means a person who:
1. Has completed applicable education, experience, examination, and recertification requirements
approved by CDR;
2. Is credentialed by CDR as a registered dietitian or a registered dietitian nutritionist; and
3. Is legally authorized to use the title registered dietitian or registered dietitian nutritionist and the
corresponding abbreviations "RD" or "RDN";
X. "Remote state" means a member state other than the home state, where a licensee is exercising or seeking
to exercise a compact privilege;
Y. "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by the compact commission that has the force of law;
Z. "Single state license" means a license issued by a member state within the issuing state and does not
include a compact privilege in any other member state;
AA. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States of America; and
AB. "Unencumbered license" means a license that authorizes a licensee to engage in the full and unrestricted
practice of dietetics.
SECTION 3.
STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To participate in the compact, a state must currently:
1. License and regulate the practice of dietetics; and
2. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about licensees.
B. A member state shall:
1. Participate fully in the compact commission’s data system, including using the unique identifier as
defined in the rules;
2. Notify the compact commission, in compliance with the terms of the compact and rules, of any
adverse action or the availability of current significant investigative information regarding a
licensee;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal history record information of applicants
for an initial compact privilege. These procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or
other biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal
history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for
retaining that state’s criminal records.
a. A member state must fully implement a criminal history record information requirement,
within a time frame established by rule, which includes receiving the results of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation record search and shall use those results in determining compact
privilege eligibility.
b. Communication between a member state and the compact commission or among member
states regarding the verification of eligibility for a compact privilege shall not include any
information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to a federal criminal
history record information check performed by a member state;
4. Comply with and enforce the rules of the compact commission;
5. Require an applicant for a compact privilege to obtain or retain a license in the licensee’s home state
and meet the home state’s qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as all other
applicable state laws; and
6. Recognize a compact privilege granted to a licensee who meets all of the requirements outlined in
Section 4 of this compact in accordance with the terms of the compact and rules.
C. Member states may set and collect a fee for granting a compact privilege.
D. Individuals not residing in a member state shall continue to be able to apply for a member state’s single
state license as provided under the laws of each member state. However, the single state license granted to
these individuals shall not be recognized as granting a compact privilege to engage in the practice of
dietetics in any other member state.
E. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a member state for the issuance of a
single state license.
F. At no point shall the compact commission have the power to define the requirements for the issuance of a
single state license to practice dietetics. The member states shall retain sole jurisdiction over the provision
of these requirements.
SECTION 4.
COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To exercise the compact privilege under the terms and provisions of the compact, the licensee shall:
1. Satisfy one (1) of the following:
a. Hold a valid current registration that gives the applicant the right to use the term registered
dietitian; or
b. Complete all of the following:
i. An education program which is either:
(a) A master’s degree or doctoral degree that is programmatically accredited by
ACEND or by a dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education, which the compact commission may by rule determine, and
from a college or university accredited at the time of graduation by the appropriate
regional accrediting agency recognized by the Council on Higher Education
Accreditation and the United States Department of Education; or
(b) An academic degree from a college or university in a foreign country equivalent
to the degree described in subsection A.1.b.i. of this section that is programmatically
accredited by ACEND or by a dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United
States Department of Education, which the compact commission may by rule
determine;

CHAPTER 33 19
ii. A planned, documented, supervised practice experience in dietetics that is
programmatically accredited by ACEND or by a dietetics accrediting agency recognized
by the United States Department of Education which the compact commission may by
rule determine and which involves at least one thousand (1,000) hours of practice
experience under the supervision of a registered dietitian or a licensed dietitian; and
iii. Successful completion of either the registration examination for dietitians administered
by CDR or a national credentialing examination for dietitians approved by the compact
commission by rule, with such completion being no more than five (5) years prior to the
date of the licensee’s application for initial licensure and accompanied by a period of
continuous licensure thereafter, all of which may be further governed by the Rules of
the compact commission;
2. Hold an unencumbered license in the home state;
3. Notify the compact commission that the licensee is seeking a compact privilege within a remote state
or states;
4. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the compact privilege;
5. Meet any jurisprudence requirements established by the remote state or states in which the licensee is
seeking a compact privilege; and
6. Report to the compact commission any adverse action, encumbrance, or restriction on a license taken
by any nonmember state within thirty (30) days from the date the action is taken.
B. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date of the home state license. To maintain a compact
privilege, renewal of the compact privilege shall be congruent with the renewal of the home state license as
the compact commission may define by rule. The licensee must comply with the requirements of subsection
A. of this section to maintain the compact privilege in the remote state or states.
C. A licensee exercising a compact privilege shall adhere to the laws and regulations of the remote state.
Licensees shall be responsible for educating themselves on, and complying with, any and all state laws
relating to the practice of dietetics in such remote state.
D. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary provided in this compact or state law, a licensee exercising a
compact privilege shall not be required to complete continuing education requirements required by a
remote state. A licensee exercising a compact privilege is only required to meet any continuing education
requirements as required by the home state.
SECTION 5.
OBTAINING A NEW HOME STATE LICENSE BASED ON A COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. A licensee may hold a home state license, which allows for a compact privilege in other member states, in
only one (1) member state at a time.
B. If a licensee changes home state by moving between two (2) member states:
1. The licensee shall file an application for obtaining a new home state license based on a compact
privilege, pay all applicable fees, and notify the current and new home state in accordance with the
rules of the compact commission;
2. Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new home state license by virtue of a compact
privilege, the new home state shall verify that the licensee meets the criteria in Section 4 of this
compact via the data system, and require that the licensee complete the following:
a. Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint based criminal history record information check;
b. Any other criminal history record information required by the new home state; and
c. Any jurisprudence requirements of the new home state;
3. The former home state shall convert the former home state license into a compact privilege once the
new home state has activated the new home state license in accordance with applicable rules adopted
by the compact commission;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this compact, if the licensee cannot meet the criteria in
Section 4 of this compact, the new home state may apply its requirements for issuing a new single
state license; and
5. The licensee shall pay all applicable fees to the new home state in order to be issued a new home
state license.
C. If a licensee changes their state of residence by moving from a member state to a nonmember state, or from
a nonmember state to a member state, the state criteria shall apply for issuance of a single state license in
the new state.
D. Nothing in this compact shall interfere with a licensee’s ability to hold a single state license in multiple
states; however, for the purposes of this compact, a licensee shall have only one (1) home state license.
E. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a member state for the issuance of a
single state license.
SECTION 6.
ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES
An active military member, or their spouse, shall designate a home state where the individual has a current license
in good standing. The individual may retain the home state designation during the period the service member is on
active duty.
SECTION 7.
ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a remote state shall have the authority, in
accordance with existing state due process law, to:
1. Take adverse action against a licensee’s compact privilege within that member state; and
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of
witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing authority in a
member state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from
another member state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction,
according to the practice and procedure applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending
before that court. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and
other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
B. Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against a licensee’s home state license.
C. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state shall give the same priority and effect to reported
conduct received from a member state as it would if the conduct had occurred within the home state. In so
doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action.
D. The home state shall complete any pending investigations of a licensee who changes home states during the
course of the investigations. The home state shall also have authority to take appropriate action and shall
promptly report the conclusions of the investigations to the administrator of the data system. The
administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the new home state of any adverse actions.
E. A member state, if otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from the affected licensee the costs of
investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that licensee.
F. A member state may take adverse action based on the factual findings of another remote state, provided that
the member state follows its own procedures for taking the adverse action.
G. Joint Investigations:
1. In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its respective state law, any member state
may participate with other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
2. Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any
joint investigation initiated under the compact.
H. If adverse action is taken by the home state against a licensee’s home state resulting in an encumbrance on
the home state license, the licensee’s compact privilege in all other member states shall be revoked until all

CHAPTER 33 21
encumbrances have been removed from the home state license. All home state disciplinary orders that
impose adverse action against a licensee shall include a statement that the licensee’s compact privileges are
revoked in all member states during the pendency of the order.
I. Once an encumbered license in the home state is restored to an unencumbered license, as certified by the
home state’s licensing authority, the licensee must meet the requirements of Section 4A. of this compact
and follow the administrative requirements to reapply to obtain a compact privilege in any remote state.
J. If a member state takes adverse action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the data system. The
administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the other member states state of any adverse actions.
K. Nothing in this compact shall override a member state’s decision that participation in an alternative
program may be used in lieu of adverse action.
SECTION 8.
ESTABLISHMENT OF THE DIETITIAN LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The compact member states hereby create and establish a joint government agency whose membership
consists of all member states that have enacted the compact known as the Dietitian Licensure Compact
Commission. The compact commission is an instrumentality of the compact states acting jointly and not an
instrumentality of any one (1) state. The compact commission shall come into existence on or after the
effective date of the compact as set forth in Section 12 of this compact.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings.
1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate selected by that member state’s
licensing authority.
2. The delegate shall be the primary administrator of the licensing authority or their designee.
3. The compact commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office for delegates and may by
rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The compact commission may recommend removal or suspension of any delegate from office.
5. A member state’s licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its delegate occurring on the compact
commission within sixty (60) days of the vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote on all matters before the compact commission
requiring a vote by the delegates.
7. Delegates shall meet and vote by such means as set forth in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for
delegates to meet and vote in-person or by telecommunication, video conference, or other means of
communication.
8. The compact commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings
may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The compact commission may meet in person or by
telecommunication, video conference, or other means of communication.
C. The compact commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the compact commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
3. Establish and amend rules and bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact, the compact
commission’s rules, and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the compact commission, provided
that the standing of any licensing authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be
affected;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state as the authenticated
business records of the compact commission, and designate an agent to do so on the compact
commission’s behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including but not limited to employees of a
member state;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals
appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the compact, and establish the compact
commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of
personnel, and other related personnel matters;
12. Assess and collect fees;
13. Accept any and all appropriate donations, grants of money, other sources of revenue, equipment,
supplies, materials, services, and gifts, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at
all times the compact commission shall avoid any actual or appearance of impropriety or conflict of
interest;
14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real, personal, or mixed, or any
undivided interest therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real,
personal, or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members, state regulators, state
legislators or their representatives, consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as
may be designated in this compact or the bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;
20. Establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair and a vice chair;
21. Determine whether a state’s adopted language is materially different from the model compact
language such that the state would not qualify for participation in the compact; and
22. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this
compact.
D. The Executive Committee.
1. The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the compact commission according
to the terms of this compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the executive committee shall
include:
a. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the compact including enforcement
and compliance with the provisions of the compact, its rules and bylaws, and other such duties
as deemed necessary;
b. Recommend to the compact commission changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to this
compact legislation, fees charged to compact member states, fees charged to licensees, and
other fees;
c. Ensure compact administration services are appropriately provided, including by contract;
d. Prepare and recommend the budget;
e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the compact commission;
f. Monitor compact compliance of member states and provide compliance reports to the compact
commission;
g. Establish additional committees as necessary;

CHAPTER 33 23
h. Exercise the powers and duties of the compact commission during the interim between
compact commission meetings, except for adopting or amending rules, adopting or amending
bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the compact
commission by rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the compact commission.
2. The executive committee shall be composed of nine (9) members:
a. The chair and vice chair of the compact commission shall be voting members of the executive
committee;
b. Five (5) voting members from the current membership of the compact commission, elected by
the compact commission;
c. One (1) ex officio, nonvoting member from a recognized professional association representing
dietitians; and
d. One (1) ex officio, nonvoting member from a recognized national credentialing organization
for dietitians.
3. The compact commission may remove any member of the executive committee as provided in the
compact commission’s bylaws.
4. The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Executive committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the executive committee
may meet in a closed, nonpublic meeting as provided in subsection F.2. of this section.
b. The executive committee shall give thirty (30) days’ notice of its meetings, posted on the
website of the compact commission and as determined to provide notice to persons with an
interest in the business of the compact commission.
c. The executive committee may hold a special meeting in accordance with subsection F.1.b. of
this section.
E. The compact commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an annual report.
F. Meetings of the Compact Commission.
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the compact commission may meet in a closed,
nonpublic meeting as provided in subsection F.2. of this section.
a. Public notice for all meetings of the full compact commission shall be given in the same
manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in Section 10 of this compact, except that
the compact commission may hold a special meeting as provided in subsection F.1.b. of this
section.
b. The compact commission may hold a special meeting when it must meet to conduct emergency
business by giving twenty-four (24) hours’ notice to all member states, on the compact
commission’s website, and other means as provided in the compact commission’s rules. The
compact commission’s legal counsel shall certify that the compact commission’s need to meet
qualifies as an emergency.
2. The compact commission or the executive committee or other committees of the compact commission
may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting for the compact commission or executive committee or
other committees of the compact commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters, practices, or procedures related
to specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the compact commission or by a member
state’s licensing authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or real estate;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted
invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the
compact commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact;
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state law; or
l. Other matters as specified in the rules of the compact commission.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state that the meeting will
be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in
the minutes.
4. The compact commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a
meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore,
including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an
action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall
remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the compact commission or order of a
court of competent jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Compact Commission.
1. The compact commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its
establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
2. The compact commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as provided in
subsection C.13. of this section.
3. The compact commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state and
impose fees on licensees of member states to whom it grants a compact privilege to cover the cost of
the operations and activities of the compact commission and its staff, which must, in a total amount,
be sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by
other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for member states shall be allocated based
upon a formula that the compact commission shall promulgate by rule.
4. The compact commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate
to meet the same; nor shall the compact commission pledge the credit of any of the member states,
except by and with the authority of the member state.
5. The compact commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the compact commission shall be subject to the financial review and
accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of
funds handled by the compact commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by a
certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included in and
become part of the annual report of the compact commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification.
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees, and representatives of the compact commission
shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim
for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of
any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim
is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of compact commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to
protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement of insurance of any
type by the compact commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted
hereunder.

CHAPTER 33 25
2. The compact commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee, and
representative of the compact commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of
any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of compact commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the compact commission that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be
construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and
provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The compact commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive director,
employee, and representative of the compact commission for the amount of any settlement or
judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
that occurred within the scope of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that
such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of compact commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did
not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any licensee for professional
malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
5. Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a member state’s state
action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the
Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or
regulation.
6. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity by the member
states or by the compact commission.
7. The liability of the executive director and employees of the compact commission or representatives of
the compact commission, acting within the scope of such person's employment or duties for acts,
errors, or omissions, may not exceed the limits of liability set forth under the constitution and laws of
this state for state officials, employees, and agents. The compact commission is considered to be an
instrumentality of the states for the purposes of any such action.
SECTION 9.
DATA SYSTEM
A. The compact commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, operation, and utilization of a
coordinated data system.
B. The compact commission shall assign each applicant for a compact privilege a unique identifier, as
determined by the rules.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform
data set to the data system on all individuals to whom this compact is applicable as required by the rules of
the compact commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license or compact privilege and information related thereto;
4. Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation, the beginning and ending
dates of such participation, and other information related to such participation not made confidential
under member state law;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for such denial;
6. The presence of current significant investigative information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact or the protection of the
public, as determined by the rules of the compact commission.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

26 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
D. The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to this compact or through the data
system, when certified by the compact commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated
business records of the compact commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in
any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a member state.
E. Current significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any member state will only be
available to other member states.
F. It is the responsibility of the member states to report any adverse action against a licensee and to monitor
the data system to determine whether any adverse action has been taken against a licensee. Adverse action
information pertaining to a licensee in any member state will be available to any other member state.
G. Member states contributing information to the data system may designate information that may not be
shared with the public without the express permission of the contributing state.
H. Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the
laws of the member state contributing the information shall be removed from the data system.
SECTION 10.
RULEMAKING
A. The compact commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and efficiently implement
and administer the purposes and provisions of the compact. A rule shall be invalid and have no force or
effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because the compact
commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the
compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
B. The rules of the compact commission shall have the force of law in each member state, provided however
that where the rules conflict with the laws or regulations of a member state that relate to the procedures,
actions, and processes a licensed dietitian is permitted to undertake in that state and the circumstances
under which they may do so, as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the rules of the compact
commission shall be ineffective in that state to the extent of the conflict.
C. The compact commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this
section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding on the day following adoption or as
of the date specified in the rule or amendment, whichever is later.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or portion of a rule, by enactment of a
statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact within four (4) years of the date of
adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the compact commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the compact commission shall hold a public hearing and allow persons
to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the compact commission, and at least thirty (30) days in advance of
the meeting at which the compact commission will hold a public hearing on the proposed rule, the compact
commission shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the compact commission or other publicly accessible platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the compact commission’s notices of proposed rulemaking;
and
3. In such other ways as the compact commission may by rule specify.
H. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the compact commission will hear public
comments on the proposed rule and, if different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the
compact commission will consider and vote on the proposed rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other means of communication,
the compact commission shall include the mechanism for access to the hearing in the notice of
proposed rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed rule and the reason therefor;

CHAPTER 33 27
4. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments and documents received by
the compact commission in response to the proposed rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be
grouped for the convenience of the compact commission at hearings required by this section.
K. The compact commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action on the proposed rule
based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
1. The compact commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided the changes do not
enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
2. The compact commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive changes made
to the proposed rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not made that were recommended by
commenters.
3. The compact commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the rule. Except for an
emergency as provided in subsection 10.L. of this section, the effective date of the rule shall be no
sooner than thirty (30) days after issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the compact commission may consider and adopt an
emergency rule with twenty-four (24) hours’ notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the usual
rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule
as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule.
For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of compact commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The compact commission or an authorized committee of the compact commission may direct revision to a
previously adopted rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in
consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revision shall be posted on the website of the
compact commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30)
days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material
change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the compact commission prior to the
end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the
revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the compact commission.
N. No member state’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this compact.
SECTION 11.
OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight.
1. The executive and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce this
compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement this compact.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this compact, venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against
the compact commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction
where the principal office of the compact commission is located. The compact commission may waive
venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative
dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue
in any action against a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar matter.
3. The compact commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding regarding
the enforcement or interpretation of the compact and shall have standing to intervene in such a
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

28 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the compact commission service of process shall
render a judgment or order void as to the compact commission, this compact, or promulgated rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination.
1. If the compact commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its
obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the compact commission
shall provide written notice to the defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the default,
the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the compact commission may
take and shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
2. The compact commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other member states.
C. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon
an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the member states, and all rights, privileges, and
benefits conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A
cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period
of default.
D. Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing
compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the compact
commission to the Governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, the
defaulting state’s licensing authority, and each of the member states’ licensing authority.
E. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred
through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of
termination.
F. Upon the termination of a state’s membership from this compact, that state shall immediately provide notice
to all licensees within that state of such termination. The terminated state shall continue to recognize all
compact privileges granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of six (6) months after the date of said
notice of termination.
G. The compact commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or that has
been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the compact commission and the
defaulting state.
H. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the compact commission by petitioning the United States
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the compact commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute Resolution.
1. Upon request by a member state, the compact commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to
the compact that arise among member states and between member and nonmember states.
2. The compact commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute
resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement.
1. By supermajority vote, the compact commission may initiate legal action against a member state in
default in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where
the compact commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the
compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and
damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall not be the
exclusive remedies of the compact commission. The compact commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or the defaulting member state’s law.
2. A member state may initiate legal action against the compact commission in the United States
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the compact commission has
its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated
rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial

CHAPTER 33 29
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. No party other than a member state shall enforce this compact against the compact commission.
SECTION 12.
EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the
seventh member state.
1. On or after the effective date of the compact, the compact commission shall convene and review the
enactment of each of the first seven (7) member states ("charter member states") to determine if the
statute enacted by each such charter member state is materially different than the model compact
statute.
a. A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially different from the model
compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in Section 11 of this compact.
b. If any member state is later found to be in default, or is terminated, or withdraws from the
compact, the compact commission shall remain in existence and the compact shall remain in
effect even if the number of member states should be less than seven (7).
2. Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the seven (7) initial charter member states shall
be subject to the process set forth in Section 8.C.21. of this compact to determine if their enactments
are materially different from the model compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in
the compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the compact commission or in furtherance of the purposes of the
administration of the compact prior to the effective date of the compact or the compact commission
coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the compact commission unless specifically
repudiated by the compact commission.
4. Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the compact commission’s initial adoption of the rules
and bylaws shall be subject to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact
becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the compact commission
shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state.
B. Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred eighty (180) days after
enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state’s licensing authority
to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this compact prior to
the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a state shall immediately provide
notice of such withdrawal to all licensees within that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory
enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all compact privileges
granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of
such notice of withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or
other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a nonmember state that does not conflict with
the provisions of this compact.
D. This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective
and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.
SECTION 13.
CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This compact and the compact commission’s rulemaking authority shall be liberally construed so as to
effectuate the purposes and the implementation and administration of the compact. Provisions of the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

30 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be construed to limit the
compact commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this
compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any member state,
a state seeking participation in the compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to any
government, agency, person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any other
government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B. of this section, the compact commission may deny a state’s participation in
the compact or, in accordance with the requirements of Section 11.B. of this compact, terminate a member
state’s participation in the compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a member state is a
material departure from the compact. Otherwise, if this compact shall be held to be contrary to the
constitution of any member state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining
member states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all severable matters.
SECTION 14.
CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not
inconsistent with the compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in conflict with the compact
are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the compact commission and the member states are binding in
accordance with their terms.
SECTION 15.
APPLICABILITY TO KENTUCKY STATE GOVERNMENT
In order to clarify the effect of certain provisions of this compact and to ensure that the rights and responsibilities
of the various branches of government are maintained, the following shall be in effect in this state:
A. By entering into this compact, this state authorizes the state licensing authority as defined in Section 2.T. of
this compact and as created by KRS 310.040 to implement the provisions of this compact;
B. Notwithstanding any provision of this compact to the contrary:
1. When a rule is adopted pursuant to Section 10 of this compact, the state licensing authority as
defined in Section 2.T. of this compact shall have sixty (60) days to review the rule for the purpose of
filing the rule as an emergency administrative regulation pursuant to KRS 13A.190 and for filing the
rule as an accompanying ordinary administrative regulation, following the requirements of KRS
Chapter 13A. Failure by the state licensing authority as defined in Section 2.T. of this compact to
promulgate a rule adopted by the Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission as an administrative
regulation pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A shall result in the initiation of the process for withdrawal
as set forth in Section 12 of this compact. Nothing in these provisions shall negate the applicability
and effect of a commission rule or Section 11 of this compact to this state;
2. If the proposed administrative regulation is found deficient and the deficiency is not resolved
pursuant to KRS 13A.330 or 13A.335, the provisions of Section 11 of this compact shall apply. If the
deficiency is resolved in a manner determined by the Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission to be
inconsistent with this compact or its rules, or if the procedures under Section 11 of this compact fail
to resolve an issue, the withdrawal provisions of Section 12 of this compact shall apply; and
3. If a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission
created by Section 8 of this compact exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond
the scope of the purposes of this compact, or the powers granted under this compact, then such an
action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force or effect;
C. Section 8.G. of this compact pertaining to the financing of the Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission
shall not be interpreted to obligate the general fund of this state. Any funds used to finance this compact
shall be from money collected pursuant to KRS 310.041; and

CHAPTER 33 31
D. This compact shall apply only to those dietitians who practice or work under a compact privilege.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 310 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall require a national and state criminal background investigation for every:
(a) Applicant seeking an initial license issued by the board permitting the applicant to engage in the
practice of dietetics;
(b) Applicant seeking to reinstate a license to engage in the practice of dietetics; and
(c) Person licensed to engage in the practice of dietetics authorized by the board who applies for
authorization to engage in the practice of dietetics outside this Commonwealth in accordance with
the dietitian licensure compact.
(2) The criminal background investigation under subsection (1) of this section shall be by means of a
fingerprint check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation
pursuant to the following requirements:
(a) The board shall require each applicant described in subsection (1) of this section to provide a
complete and legible set of fingerprints to the Department of Kentucky State Police for submission to
the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal background check after a state criminal
background check is conducted;
(b) The results of the national and state criminal background check shall be sent to the board for the
screening of applicants;
(c) The results of a national and state criminal background check shall not be distributed or otherwise
released by the board, except that the board:
1. Shall provide any applicant or credential holder the results of his or her national and state
criminal background check upon request; and
2. May introduce the results under seal as evidence in a legal proceeding that involves a
challenge to any disciplinary action taken by the board based in whole or in part on
information contained in the results; and
(d) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police or for the Federal Bureau of
Investigation background check shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the
request and conducting the background check.
(3) The board shall review the criminal background check results for every person described in subsection
(1)(c) of this section and determine whether the person is eligible to apply for the compact privilege to
practice outside this Commonwealth.
(4) The board may require a criminal background check for any person licensed to engage in the practice of
dietetics authorized by the board who is the subject of an active investigation for a violation under this
chapter or administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.
(5) Unless otherwise required by law, the board shall not require a criminal background check solely for the
purpose of renewing a license.
(6) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement
this section.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
ATHLETIC TRAINER COMPACT
SECTION 1. TITLE AND PURPOSE
This statute shall be known and cited as the Athletic Trainer Compact. The purposes of this compact are to expand
mobility of athletic training practice and improve public access to services by providing qualified licensed athletic
trainers the ability to practice in other member states. This compact preserves the regulatory authority of states to
protect public health and safety through the current system of state licensure.
This compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

32 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
A. Increase public access to athletic training and enhance continuity of care by providing for the mutual
recognition of other licenses issued by member states;
B. Provide an additional streamlined opportunity for interstate practice by licensed athletic trainers who meet
compact uniform requirements;
C. Promote mobility and workforce development by eliminating the necessity for licenses in multiple states by
providing for the mutual recognition of other licenses issued by member states;
D. Reduce administrative burdens on licensed athletic trainers and member states;
E. Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health and safety;
F. Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating interstate practice of licensed athletic trainers;
G. Support relocating active military members and their spouses;
H. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary information among member states;
I. Allow for the use of telehealth to facilitate increased access to athletic training services;
J. Support the uniformity of licensed athletic trainer licensure requirements throughout the states;
K. Affirm the authority of all member states to hold a licensed athletic trainer accountable for abiding by the
scope of practice in the state in which the patient is located at the time of care; and
L. Require adherence to the model compact language in order to promote uniformity and ensure that all
member states have accepted and are mutually obligated to the same terms.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions shall apply:
A. "Active military member" means any individual with full-time duty status in the active armed forces of the
United States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve;
B. "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action permitted by a state’s laws
which is imposed by a licensing authority or other authority against a licensee, including actions against an
individual’s license or compact privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the
licensee, limitation on the licensee’s practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a licensee’s
authorization to practice;
C. "Alternative program" means a non-disciplinary monitoring or practice remediation process applicable to
an athletic trainer approved by a state licensing authority of a member state in which the athletic trainer is
licensed. This includes, but is not limited to, programs to which licensees with substance use, addiction, or
mental health conditions are referred in lieu of adverse action;
D. "Athletic training" means the prevention, examination, assessment, treatment and rehabilitation of
emergent, acute, or chronic injuries and medical conditions as defined by applicable member state laws and
regulations;
E. "Athletic Trainer Compact Commission" or "Compact Commission" means the government agency whose
membership consists of all states that have enacted this compact, as described herein and which shall
operate as an instrumentality of the member states to administer and implement the compact according to
its terms;
F. "BOC" means the Board of Certification, Inc., or any successor organization thereto;
G. "CAATE" means the Commission on Accreditation of Athletic Training Education or any successor
organization thereto;
H. "Charter member state" means any member state which enacted and made effective this compact by law
before the compact effective date specified herein;
I. "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a member state to serve as the member of the
commission for that member state;
J. "Compact privilege" means the legal authorization granted by a remote state, equivalent to a license,
allowing a licensee from another member state to provide athletic training services in a remote state;

CHAPTER 33 33
K. "Compact qualifying license" means a license that is not an encumbered license issued by a member state
to practice athletic training which qualifies the licensee to exercise a compact privilege pursuant to Section
4 of this compact;
L. "Continuing competence" means a requirement, as a condition of license renewal, to provide evidence of
successful participation, and completion of, educational and professional activities relevant to practice or
area of work. For purposes of this compact, evidence of active BOC certification may satisfy the meaning of
continuing competence as set forth herein;
M. "Current significant investigative information" means the existence of:
1. Investigative information that a licensing authority, after a preliminary inquiry that includes
notification and an opportunity for the subject licensee to respond, if required by state law, has
reason to believe is not groundless and, if proven true, would indicate more than a minor infraction;
or
2. Investigative information that indicates that the subject licensee represents an immediate threat to
public health and safety regardless of whether the subject licensee has been notified and had an
opportunity to respond;
N. "Criminal background check" means the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information
for a license applicant for the purpose of obtaining that applicant’s criminal history record information, as
defined in 28 C.F.R. sec. 20.3(d) from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the state’s criminal history
record repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. sec. 20.3(f);
O. "Data system" means the commission’s repository of information about licensees, including but not limited
to examination, licensure, investigative, compact privilege, adverse action, and alternative program;
P. "Encumbrance" or "encumbered" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation or condition on,
the full and unrestricted practice of athletic training;
Q. "Executive committee" means a group of commissioners elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and
within the powers granted to them by, the compact and commission;
R. "Investigative information" means information, records, and documents received or generated by a
licensing authority pursuant to an investigation;
S. "Jurisprudence requirement" means the assessment of an individual’s knowledge of the laws and rules
governing the practice of athletic training, as applicable, in a state;
T. "License" means current authorization by a member state to engage in the practice of athletic training;
U. "Licensee" or "licensed athletic trainer" means an individual who currently holds an active, unrestricted
license and who meets all of the requirements outlined in Section 4 of this compact;
V. "Licensing authority" means the board or agency of a state, or equivalent, that is responsible for the
licensing and regulation of athletic trainers;
W. "Model compact language" the model language for the Athletic Trainer Compact on file with the Council
of State Governments or other entity as designated by the commission to which all member states must
substantively adhere and adopt;
X. "Member state" means a state that has enacted the compact;
Y. "Remote state" means a member state other than the state of qualifying licensure;
Z. "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an authorized entity that has the force of law;
AA. "Scope of practice" means the procedures, actions, and processes an athletic trainer licensed in a state is
permitted to undertake in that state and the circumstances under which the licensee is permitted to
undertake those procedures, actions and processes. Such procedures, actions and processes and the
circumstances under which they may be undertaken may be established through means, including, but not
limited to, statute, regulations, case law, and other processes available to the state licensing authority or
other government agency. Scope of practice shall include any state requirements regarding supervision or
direction, if required by such state and as further defined by such state’s statutes and regulations;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

34 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
BB. "Single state license" means a license issued by any state that authorizes practice only within the issuing
state;
CC. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States of America;
DD. "State of qualifying licensure" means the member state who has issued a compact qualifying license to a
licensee pursuant to this compact; and
EE. "Unencumbered license" means a license that authorizes a licensee to engage in the full and unrestricted
practice of athletic training.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To be eligible to join this compact and to maintain eligibility as a member state, a state must:
1. Enact and maintain a statute that is not materially different from the model compact language;
2. License and regulate the practice of athletic training;
3. Require that licensees in that state maintain continuing competence standards as part of their state
practice act or rules;
4. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about licensees;
5. Grant the compact privilege to a licensee who meets all the requirements outlined in Section 4 of this
compact in accordance with the terms of the compact and any rules promulgated thereunder;
6. Participate fully in the compact commission’s data system, including using the unique identifier as
defined in rules;
7. Notify the compact commission, in compliance with the terms of the compact and rules, of any
adverse action or the availability of current significant investigative information regarding a
licensee;
8. Within a time frame established by rule, implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal
history records of applicants for a compact qualifying license which includes receiving the results of
the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search and shall use those results in making licensure
decisions. These procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based
information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal history record
information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that
state’s criminal records; and
a. A member state must fully implement a criminal background check requirement in order to
participate in the issuance and acceptance of compact privileges; and
b. Communication between a member state and the compact commission or among member
states regarding the verification of eligibility for licensure through the compact shall not
include any information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to a
federal criminal records check performed by a member state; and
9. Comply with and enforce the rules of the compact commission.
B. Member states may set and collect a fee for issuance and renewal of a compact privilege to applicants.
C. Individuals without a compact qualifying license shall continue to be able to apply for a member state’s
single-state license as provided under the laws of each member state.
D. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a member state for the issuance of a
single state license.
E. A compact qualifying license shall be recognized by each remote state as authorizing that licensee to engage
in the practice of athletic training, under a compact privilege, in another member state in accordance with
the requirements in Section 4 of this compact.
SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To be eligible for a compact privilege under the terms and provisions of the compact, the licensee shall
complete a criminal background check performed by the licensing authority in the state of qualifying
licensure prior to entry in the compact and shall:

CHAPTER 33 35
1. Satisfy one (1) of the following two (2) pathways:
a. Hold a valid current active certification through the BOC, or its successor organization; or
b. If a licensee does not meet the requirements of Section 4.A.1.a. of this compact, the following
must be completed:
i. An education program which is either:
1. At least a bachelor’s degree with a major course of study in athletic training, or
an equivalent course of study from a college or university accredited at the time
of graduation by CAATE, or its successor organization;
2. An academic degree from a college or university in a foreign country equivalent
to the degree described in subparagraph 1 of this subsection with a major course
of study as described in subparagraph 1 of this subsection that is accredited by
CAATE, or its successor organization; or
3. The substantial equivalent of the foregoing which the commission may determine
by rule.
ii. Successful completion of the exam administered by the BOC, or its successor
organization, preceding the date of the licensee’s application for licensure in their state
of qualifying licensure or the substantial equivalent of the foregoing requirement which
the commission may determine by rule.
2. Hold a compact qualifying license;
3. Have not had any encumbrance against any license or compact privilege to practice athletic training
within the previous two (2) years;
4. Be eligible for a compact privilege in any member state in accordance with Section 4 of this compact;
5. Notify the compact commission that the licensee is seeking the compact privilege within a remote
state(s);
6. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the compact privilege;
7. Meet only the continuing competence requirements established by the state of qualifying licensure;
8. Comply with any requirements of the state of qualifying licensure as set forth in Section 3 of this
compact;
9. Meet any jurisprudence requirements established by the remote state(s) in which the licensee is
seeking a compact privilege; and
10. Report to the compact commission any adverse action, encumbrance, or restriction on a license taken
by any non-member state within thirty (30) days from the date the action is taken.
B. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date of the compact qualifying license. To maintain a
compact privilege, renewal of the compact privilege shall be congruent with the renewal of the compact
qualifying license as the compact commission may define by rule. The licensee must comply with the
requirements of this section to maintain the compact privilege in the remote state. A licensee may apply for
and hold compact privileges in multiple member states.
C. A licensed athletic trainer must follow the scope of practice of the member state where the patient is located.
A licensee engaging in the practice of athletic training in a remote state under the compact privilege shall
adhere to the scope of practice laws and regulations of the remote state. Licensees shall be responsible for
educating themselves on, and complying with, any and all scope of practice laws and regulations state laws
relating to the remote practice of athletic training, as applicable.
D. A licensee engaging in the practice of athletic training in a remote state is subject to that state’s regulatory
authority. A remote state may, in accordance with due process and that state’s laws, remove a licensee’s
compact privilege in the remote state for a specific period of time, impose fines, or take any other necessary
actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens. Any member state which undertakes such an action
shall promptly notify the member state and the commission as specified in the rules. The licensee may be
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

36 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
deemed to be ineligible to exercise the compact privilege by any member state until the specific time for
removal has passed and all fines are paid.
E. All member state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against a compact qualifying license shall
result in deactivation of the licensee’s compact privilege in all member states during the pendency of the
order. If a compact qualifying license is encumbered, the licensee shall lose the compact privilege in any
remote state until the following occur:
1. The compact qualifying license is no longer encumbered; and
2. The licensee has not had any encumbrance or restriction against any license, compact qualifying
license or compact privilege within the previous two (2) years.
F. Once an encumbered license is restored to good standing as a compact qualifying license (as certified by the
licensing authority), the licensee must meet the requirements of this section to obtain a compact privilege in
any remote state.
G. If a licensee’s compact privilege in any remote state is removed, that licensee may also lose the compact
privilege in other remote states, as each member state shall determine in its sole authority, until the
following occur:
1. The specific period of time for which the compact privilege was removed has ended;
2. All fines have been paid; and
3. Have not had any encumbrance or restriction against any license or compact privilege within the
previous two (2) years.
H. Once the requirements of Section 4.G of this compact have been met, the licensee must meet the
requirements in Section 4.A of this compact to obtain a compact privilege in a remote state.
SECTION 5. COMPACT QUALIFYING LICENSE
A. A licensee may only designate one (1) license as their compact qualifying license at a time. The procedures
for such designation may be further defined by compact commission rule.
B. Nothing in this section shall require that the state of qualifying licensure be the state of primary residence
or state of primary practice for the licensee.
C. Nothing in this compact shall interfere with a licensee’s ability to hold a single state license in multiple
states.
D. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a member state for the issuance of a
single state license.
SECTION 6. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER OR THEIR SPOUSES
An active military member or their spouse shall not be required to pay a fee to the commission for a compact
privilege. If a member state chooses to charge a member state fee, it may choose to charge a reduced fee or no fee
to an active military member or their spouse for a compact privilege.
SECTION 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. A member state in which a licensee is issued a compact qualifying license shall have the exclusive authority
to impose adverse action against the compact qualifying license issued by that member state.
B. A member state may take adverse action based on current significant investigative information of a remote
state, so long as the member state follows its own procedures for imposing adverse action.
C. Nothing in this compact shall override a member state’s decision that participation in an alternative
program may be used in lieu of adverse action and that such participation shall remain non-public if
required by the member state’s laws or rules.
D. A remote state shall have the authority to:
1. Take adverse actions as set forth herein against a licensee’s compact privilege in that state; and
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of
witnesses as well as the production of evidence.

CHAPTER 33 37
a. Subpoenas may be issued by a member state athletic training licensing authority for the
attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence.
b. A member state which issues a subpoena may request service of that subpoena by another
member state. The member state receiving the request to serve a subpoena shall serve the
subpoena if it is deemed enforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction according to the
practice and procedure in the receiving member state.
c. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees
required by the service statutes of the state where the witnesses or evidence are located.
E. For purposes of taking adverse action, a member state shall give the same priority and effect to reported
conduct received from another member state as it would if the conduct had occurred within that state. In so
doing, the investigating member state shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action.
F. A member state, if otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from the affected licensee the costs of
investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that licensee.
G. Joint Investigations:
1. In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its respective state law, any member state
may participate with other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
2. Member states shall share any current significant investigative information, litigation, or compliance
materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the compact. In
sharing such information between member state athletic trainer licensing authorities, all information
obtained shall be kept confidential, except as otherwise mutually agreed upon by the sharing and
receiving member state(s).
3. A remote state may issue subpoenas on behalf of a member state for both hearings and investigations
that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence.
H. If a member state takes adverse action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the data system. The
administrator of the data system shall promptly notify all member states of any adverse actions by remote
states.
I. Nothing in this compact may permit a member state to take any adverse action against a licensee or holder
of a compact privilege for conduct or practice occurring in another member state that was legal in the
member state at the time it was undertaken.
SECTION 8. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE COMMISSION
A. The compact member states hereby create and establish a joint government agency whose membership
consists of all member states that have enacted the compact known as the athletic trainer licensure compact
commission. The compact commission is an instrumentality of the member states acting jointly and not an
instrumentality of any one (1) state. The compact commission shall come into existence on or after the
effective date of the compact as set forth in Section 12 of this compact.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1) commissioner selected by that member state’s
licensing authority within sixty (60) days of the member state’s effective date.
2. The commissioner shall be an administrator or their designated staff or current board member of the
licensing authority.
3. The compact commission may recommend removal or suspension of any commissioner from office.
4. A member state’s licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its commissioner occurring on the
compact commission within sixty (60) days of the vacancy.
5. Each commissioner shall be entitled to one (1) vote on all matters before the compact commission
requiring a vote by the commissioners.
6. The compact commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings
may be held as set forth in the commission bylaws. A commissioner shall vote in person or by such
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

38 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for commissioners to meet by
telecommunication, videoconference, or other means of communication.
C. The compact commission shall have the following powers:
1. Promulgate, adopt, and amend rules and bylaws;
2. Establish code of conduct, confidentiality, and conflict of interest policies for commissioners;
3. Establish the fiscal year of the compact commission;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Purchase and maintain insurance and insurance bonds;
6. Accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a member
state;
7. Conduct a financial review or audit;
8. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals
appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the compact, and establish the compact
commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of
personnel, and other related personnel matters;
9. Enter into contracts or arrangements for the management of the affairs of the commission;
10. Assess and collect fees;
11. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other sources of revenue,
equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided
that at all times the compact commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of
interest;
12. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, invest, or use any property, real, personal, or mixed, or
any undivided interest therein;
13. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real,
personal, or mixed;
14. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
15. Borrow and invest money;
16. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact, the compact
commission’s rules, and the bylaws;
17. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the compact commission, provided
that the standing of any licensing authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be
affected;
18. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state as the authenticated
business records of the compact commission, and designate an agent to do so on the compact
commission’s behalf;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;
20. Determine whether a state’s adopted language is materially different from the model compact
language such that the state would not qualify for participation in the compact;
21. Establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair and a vice chair, secretary, treasurer,
and such other offices as the commission shall establish by rule or bylaw;
22. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of member state commissioners, state
regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other
interested persons as may be designated in this compact and the bylaws; and
23. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this
compact.
D. The Executive Committee

CHAPTER 33 39
1. The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the compact commission according
to the terms of this compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the executive committee shall
include:
a. Exercise the powers and duties of the compact commission during the interim between
compact commission meetings, except for adopting or amending rules, adopting or amending
bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the compact
commission by rule or bylaw;
b. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the compact including enforcement
and compliance with the provisions of the compact, its rules and bylaws, and other such duties
as deemed necessary;
c. Recommend to the compact commission changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to this
compact legislation, fees charged to compact member states, fees charged to licensees, and
other fees;
d. Ensure compact administration services are appropriately provided, including by contract;
e. Prepare and recommend the budget;
f. Maintain financial records on behalf of the compact commission;
g. Monitor compact compliance of member states and provide compliance reports to the compact
commission;
h. Establish additional committees as necessary; and
i. Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the compact commission.
2. The executive committee shall be composed of five (5) voting members, elected by the compact
commission:
a. The chair and vice chair of the compact commission, shall be voting members of the executive
committee;
b. The compact commission shall elect up to three (3) additional voting members from the
current membership of the compact commission to include the offices of treasurer, secretary,
and one (1) member-at-large; and
c. Up to four (4) ex-officio, nonvoting members from recognized national athletic trainer
organizations.
3. The compact commission may remove any member of the executive committee as provided in the
compact commission’s bylaws.
4. The executive committee shall meet at least annually:
1. Executive committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the executive committee
may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in this section.
2. The executive committee shall give advance notice of its meetings, posted on its website and as
determined by rule or bylaw to provide notice to persons with an interest in the business of the
compact commission.
3. The executive committee may hold a special meeting in accordance with this section.
E. The compact commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an annual report.
F. Meetings of the Compact Commission:
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the compact commission may meet in a closed,
non-public meeting as provided in this section.
2. Public notice for all meetings of the full compact commission of meetings shall be given in the same
manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in this compact, except that the compact
commission may hold a special meeting as provided in this section.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

40 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. The compact commission may hold a special meeting when it must meet to conduct emergency
business by giving twenty-four (24) hours’ notice to all commissioners, on the compact commission’s
website, and other means as provided in the compact commission’s rules. The compact commission’s
legal counsel shall certify that the compact commission’s need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
4. The compact commission or the executive committee or other committees of the compact commission
may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the compact commission or executive committee or
other committees of the compact commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a member state with its obligations under the compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or procedures related to
specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by a member state’s licensing authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted
invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the
compact commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact;
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state law; or
l. Other matters as specified in rules of the compact commission.
5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the compact commission’s legal counsel or designee
shall certify that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and
such reference shall be recorded in the minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall
remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the compact commission or order of a
court of competent jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Compact Commission:
1. The compact commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its
establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
2. The compact commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as provided in this
section.
3. The compact commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state and
impose fees on licensees of member states to whom it grants a compact privilege to cover the cost of
the operations and activities of the compact commission and its staff, which must be in a total
amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided
by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for member states shall be allocated
based upon a formula that the compact commission shall promulgate by rule.
4. The compact commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds or a loan
adequate to meet the same; nor shall the compact commission pledge the credit of any of the member
states, except by and with the authority of the member state.
5. The compact commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the compact commission shall be subject to the financial review or
audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and
disbursements of funds handled by the compact commission shall be subject to an annual financial
review or audit by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review or
audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the compact commission.

CHAPTER 33 41
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification:
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the compact commission
shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim
for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of
any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim
is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of compact commission
employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to
protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement of insurance of any
type by the compact commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted
hereunder.
2. The compact commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee, and
representative of the compact commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of
any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of compact commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the compact commission that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be
construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and
provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The compact commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive director,
employee, and representative of the compact commission for the amount of any settlement or
judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
that occurred within the scope of compact commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that
such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of compact commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did
not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any licensee for professional
malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
5. Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a member state’s state
action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the
Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or
regulation.
6. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity by the member
states or by the compact commission.
7. The liability of the executive director and employees of the compact commission or representatives of
the compact commission, acting within the scope of such person's employment or duties for acts,
errors, or omissions, may not exceed the limits of liability set forth under the constitution and laws of
this state for state officials, employees, and agents. The compact commission is considered to be an
instrumentality of the states for the purposes of any such action.
SECTION 9. DATA SYSTEM
A. The commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated
data system and reporting system containing licensure, compact privileges, adverse action, and the presence
of current significant investigative information on all licensees and applicants for a license in member
states.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform
data set to the data system on all licensees, applicants, and others to whom this compact is applicable as
required by the rules of the compact commission, including:
1. Personally identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

42 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Adverse actions against a licensee, license applicant or compact privilege and information related
thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to alternative program participation, the beginning and ending
dates of such participation, and other information related to such participation;
5. Any denial of an application for licensure, and the reason(s) for such denial, (excluding the
reporting of any criminal history record information where prohibited by law);
6. A binary determination regarding the presence of current significant investigative information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact or the protection of the
public, as determined by the rules of the commission.
C. The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to this compact or through the data
system, when certified by the commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business
records of the commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant
judicial, quasi-judicial or administrative proceedings in a member state.
D. Current significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any member state will only be
available to other member states.
E. It is the responsibility of the member states to monitor the data system to determine whether adverse action
has been taken against a licensee or license applicant. Adverse action information pertaining to a licensee
or license applicant in any member state will be available to any other member state.
F. Member states contributing information to the data system may designate information that may not be
shared with the public without the express permission of the contributing state.
G. Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the
laws of the member state contributing the information shall be removed from the data system.
SECTION 10. RULEMAKING
A. The compact commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and efficiently implement
and administer the purposes and provisions of the compact. A rule shall be invalid and have no force or
effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because the compact
commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the
compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
B. The rules of the compact commission shall have the force of law in each member state, provided however
that where the rules conflict with the laws or regulations of a member state that relate to the scope of
practice a licensed athletic trainer is permitted to undertake in that state and the circumstances under
which they may do so, as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the rules of the compact commission
shall be ineffective in that state to the extent of the conflict.
C. The compact commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this
section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules of this compact shall become binding on the day following
adoption or as of the date specified in the rule or amendment, whichever is later.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or portion of a rule, by enactment of a
statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact within four (4) years of the date of
adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the compact commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the compact commission shall hold a public hearing and allow persons
to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments. At least thirty (30) days in
advance of the public hearing on the proposed rule, the compact commission shall provide a notice of
proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the compact commission or other publicly accessible platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the compact commission’s notices of proposed rulemaking;
and
3. In such other way(s) as the compact commission may by rule specify.
G. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:

CHAPTER 33 43
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the compact commission will hear public
comments on the proposed rule and, if different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the
compact commission will consider and vote on the proposed rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic means, the
compact commission shall include the mechanism for access to the hearing in the notice of proposed
rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
H. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments and documents received by
the compact commission in response to the proposed rule shall be available to the public.
I. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be
grouped for the convenience of the compact commission at hearings required by this section.
J. The compact commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action on the proposed rule
based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
1. The compact commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided the changes do not
enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
2. The compact commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive changes made
to the proposed rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not made that were recommended by
commenters.
3. The compact commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the rule. Except for an
emergency as provided in this section, the effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than thirty (30)
days after issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
K. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the compact commission may consider and adopt an
emergency rule with twenty-four (24) hours’ notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the usual
rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule
as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule.
For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of compact commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
L. The compact commission or an authorized committee of the compact commission may direct revisions to a
previously adopted rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in
consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
compact commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30)
days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material
change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the compact commission prior to the
end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the
revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the compact commission.
M. No member state’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this compact.
SECTION 11. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight:
1. The executive and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce this
compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement the compact.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this compact, venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against
the compact commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

44 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
where the principal office of the compact commission is located. The compact commission may waive
venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative
dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue
in any action against a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The compact commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding regarding
the enforcement or interpretation of the compact and shall have standing to intervene in such a
proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the compact commission service of process shall
render a judgment or order void as to the compact commission, this compact, or promulgated rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination:
1. If the compact commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its
obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall
provide written notice to the defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the
proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the compact commission may take,
and shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
2. The compact commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other member states.
C. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon
an affirmative vote of a majority of the commissioners of the member states, and all rights, privileges and
benefits conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A
cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period
of default.
D. Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing
compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the compact
commission to the Governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, the
defaulting state’s licensing authority and each of the member states’ licensing authority.
E. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred
through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of
termination.
F. Upon the termination of a state’s membership from this compact, that state shall immediately provide notice
to all licensees within that state of such termination. The terminated state shall continue to recognize all
licenses and compact privileges granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty
(180) days after the date of said notice of termination.
G. The compact commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or that has
been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the compact commission and the
defaulting state.
H. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the compact commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court
for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the compact commission has its principal offices.
The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute Resolution:
1. Upon request by a member state, the compact commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to
the compact that arise among member states and between member and non-member states.
2. The compact commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute
resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement:
1. By two-thirds (2/3) majority vote, the compact commission may initiate legal action against a member
state in default in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the compact commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of
the compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and
damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall not be the
exclusive remedies of the compact commission. The compact commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or the defaulting member state’s law.

CHAPTER 33 45
2. A member state may initiate legal action against the compact commission in the U.S. District Court
for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the compact commission has its principal
offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules. The relief
sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
attorney’s fees.
3. No person other than a member state shall enforce this compact against the compact commission.
SECTION 12. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the
seventh member state.
1. On or after the effective date of the compact, the compact commission shall convene and review the
enactment of each of the first seven (7) member states ("charter member states") to determine if the
statute enacted and made effective by each such charter member state is materially different than the
model compact statute.
a. A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially different from the model
compact language shall be entitled to the default process set forth in Section 11 of this
compact.
b. If any member state is later found to be in default, or is terminated or withdraws from the
compact, the compact commission shall remain in existence and the compact shall remain in
effect even if the number of member states should be less than seven (7).
2. Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the seven (7) initial charter member states shall
be subject to the process set forth in this section to determine if their enactments are materially
different from the model compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in the compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the compact commission or in furtherance of the purposes of the
administration of the compact prior to the effective date of the compact or the compact commission
coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the compact commission unless specifically
repudiated by the compact commission.
4. Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the compact commission’s initial adoption of the rules
and bylaws shall be subject to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact
becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the compact commission
shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state.
B. Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred eighty (180) days after
enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state’s licensing authority
to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this compact prior to
the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a state shall immediately provide
notice of such withdrawal to all licensees and privilege holders within that state. Notwithstanding any
subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to recognize
all compact privileges granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180)
days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
4. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any licensure
agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a non-member state that
does not conflict with the provisions of this compact.
5. This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this compact shall become
effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.
SECTION 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

46 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
A. This compact and the compact commission’s rulemaking authority shall be liberally construed so as to
effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and administration of the compact. Provisions of the
compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be construed to limit the
compact commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this
compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any member state,
a state seeking participation in the compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to any
government, agency, person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any other
government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the compact commission may deny a state’s participation in the compact or
terminate a member state’s participation in the compact if it determines that a constitutional requirement of
a member state is a material departure from the compact. Otherwise, if this compact shall be held to be
contrary to the constitution of any member state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the
remaining member states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all severable
matters.
SECTION 14. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not
inconsistent with the compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in conflict with the compact
are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the compact commission and the member states are binding in
accordance with their terms.
SECTION 15. APPLICABILITY TO KENTUCKY STATE GOVERNMENT
In order to clarify the effect of certain provisions of this compact and to ensure that the rights and responsibilities
of the various branches of government are maintained, the following shall be in effect in this state:
A. By entering into this compact, this state authorizes the state athletic trainer licensing authority as defined in
Section 2.V. of this compact and as created by KRS 311.530 and authorized to promulgate administrative
regulations under KRS 311.901 to implement the provisions of this compact;
B. Notwithstanding any provision of this compact to the contrary:
1. When a rule is adopted pursuant to Section 10 of this compact, the state athletic trainer licensing
authority as defined in Section 2.V. of this compact shall have sixty (60) days to review the rule for
the purpose of filing the rule as an emergency administrative regulation pursuant to KRS 13A.190
and for filing the rule as an accompanying ordinary administrative regulation, in accordance with
the requirements in KRS Chapter 13A. Failure by the state athletic trainer licensing authority as
defined in Section 2.V. of this compact to promulgate a rule adopted by the athletic trainer licensure
compact commission as an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A shall result in
the initiation of the process for withdrawal as set forth in Section 12 of this compact. Nothing in
these provisions shall negate the applicability and effect of a commission rule or Section 10 of this
compact to this state;
2. If the proposed administrative regulation is found deficient and the deficiency is not resolved
pursuant to KRS 13A.330 or 13A.335, the provisions of Section 11 of this compact shall apply. If the
deficiency is resolved in a manner determined by the athletic trainer licensure compact commission
to be inconsistent with this compact or its rules, or if the procedures under Section 11 of this compact
fail to resolve an issue, the withdrawal provisions of Section 12 of this compact shall apply; and
3. If a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the Athletic Trainer Compact Commission
created by Section 8 of this compact exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond
the scope of the purposes of this compact, or the powers granted under this compact, then such an
action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force or effect;
C. Section 8.G. of this compact pertaining to the financing of the Athletic Trainer Compact Commission shall
not be interpreted to obligate the general fund of this state. Any funds used to finance this compact shall be
from money collected pursuant to KRS 311.610; and

CHAPTER 33 47
D. This compact shall apply only to those athletic trainers who practice or work under a compact privilege.
Signed by Governor April 6, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version